Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3678.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 117.012, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Exceptions. new text begin Notwithstanding chapters 103D and 103E, new text end this chapter deleted text begin does not applydeleted text end new text begin appliesnew text end to the taking of property under laws relating to drainage or to town roads deleted text begin when those laws themselves expressly provide for the taking and specifically prescribe the proceduredeleted text end . The taking of property for a project undertaken by a watershed district under chapter 103D or for a project undertaken by a drainage authority under chapter 103E deleted text begin may be carried out under the procedure provided by those chaptersdeleted text end new text begin is legally null and void unless the district or authority complied with the procedures under this chapternew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to a taking of property on or after that date. new text end